California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(i) Corneal scraping with cultures.

(ii) Debridement of corneal epithelium not associated with band keratopathy.

(iii) Mechanical epilation.

(iv) Collection of blood by skin puncture or venipuncture for laboratory testing authorized by this subdivision.

(v) Suture removal subject to comanagement requirements in paragraph (7) of subdivision (b).

(vi) Treatment or removal of sebaceous cysts by expression.

(vii) Lacrimal punctal occlusion using plugs, or placement of a stent or similar device in a lacrimal canaliculus intended to deliver a medication the optometrist is certified to prescribe or provide.

(viii) Foreign body and staining removal from the cornea, eyelid, and conjunctiva with any appropriate instrument. Removal of corneal foreign bodies and any related stain shall, as relevant, be limited to that which is nonperforating, no deeper than the midstroma, and not reasonably anticipated to require surgical repair.

(ix) Lacrimal irrigation and dilation in patients 12 years of age or over, excluding probing of the nasolacrimal tract. The board shall certify any optometrist who graduated from an
 accredited school of optometry before May 1, 2000, to perform this procedure after submitting proof of satisfactory completion of 10 procedures under the supervision of an ophthalmologist as confirmed by the ophthalmologist. Any optometrist who graduated from an accredited school of optometry on or after May 1, 2000, shall be exempt from the certification requirement contained in this paragraph.

(x) Administration of oral fluorescein for the purpose of ocular angiography.

(xi) Intravenous injection for the purpose of performing ocular angiography at the direction of an ophthalmologist as part of an active treatment plan in a setting where a physician and surgeon is immediately available.

(xii) Use of noninvasive devices delivering intense pulsed light therapy or low-level light therapy that do not rely on laser
 technology, limited to treatment of conditions and diseases of the adnexa.

(xiii) Use of an intranasal stimulator in conjunction with treatment of dry eye syndrome.

(G) Using additional noninvasive medical devices or technology that:

(i) Have received a United States Food and Drug Administration approved indication for the diagnosis or treatment of a condition or disease authorized by this chapter. A licensee shall successfully complete any clinical training imposed by a related manufacturer prior to using any of those noninvasive medical devices or technologies.

(ii) Have been approved by the board through regulation for the rational treatment of a condition or disease authorized by this chapter. Any regulation under this paragraph shall require a
 licensee to successfully complete an appropriate amount of clinical training to qualify to use each noninvasive medical device or technology approved by the board pursuant to this paragraph.

(b) Exceptions or limitations to the provisions of subdivision (a) are as follows:

(1) Treatment of the following is excluded from the practice of optometry in a patient under 18 years of age, unless explicitly allowed otherwise:

(A) Anterior segment inflammation, which shall not exclude treatment of:

(i) The conjunctiva.

(ii) Nonmalignant ocular surface disease, including dry eye syndrome.

(iii) Contact lens-related inflammation of the
 cornea.

(iv) An infection of the cornea.

(B) Conditions or diseases of the sclera.

(2) Use of any oral prescription steroid anti-inflammatory medication for a patient under 18 years of age shall be done pursuant to a documented, timely consultation with an appropriate physician and surgeon.

(3) Use of any nonantibiotic oral prescription medication for a patient under five years of age shall be done pursuant to a documented, prior consultation with an appropriate physician and surgeon.

(4) The following classes of agents are excluded from the practice of optometry unless they have an explicit United States Food and Drug Administration-approved indication for treatment of a condition or
 disease authorized under this section:

(A) Antiamoebics.

(B) Antineoplastics.

(C) Coagulation modulators.

(D) Hormone modulators.

(E) Immunomodulators.

(5) The following are excluded from authorization under subparagraph (G) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (a):

(A) A laboratory test or imaging study.

(B) Any noninvasive device or technology that constitutes surgery under paragraph (6).

(6) Performing surgery is excluded from the
 practice of optometry. “Surgery” means any act in which human tissue is cut, altered, or otherwise infiltrated by any means. It does not mean an act that solely involves the administration or prescribing of a topical or oral therapeutic pharmaceutical.

(7) (A) Treatment with topical and oral medications authorized in subdivision (a) related to an ocular surgery shall be comanaged with the ophthalmologist that performed the surgery, or another ophthalmologist designated by that surgeon, during the customary preoperative and postoperative period for the procedure. For purposes of this subparagraph, this may involve treatment of ocular inflammation in a patient under 18 years of age.

(B) Where published, the postoperative period shall be the “global” period established by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, or, if not published, a reasonable period not to exceed
 90 days.

(C) Such comanaged treatment may include addressing agreed-upon complications of the surgical procedure occurring in any ocular or adnexal structure with topical and oral medications authorized in subdivision (a). For patients under 18 years of age, this subparagraph shall not apply unless the patient’s primary care provider agrees to allowing comanagement of complications.

(c) An optometrist certified pursuant to Section 3041.3 shall be certified to medically treat authorized glaucomas under this chapter after meeting the following requirements:

(1) For licensees who graduated from an accredited school of optometry on or after May 1, 2008, submission of proof of graduation from that institution.

(2) For licensees who were certified to treat
 glaucoma under this section before January 1, 2009, submission of proof of completion of that certification program.

(3) For licensees who completed a didactic course of not less than 24 hours in the diagnosis, pharmacological, and other treatment and management of glaucoma, submission of proof of satisfactory completion of the case management requirements for certification established by the board.

(4) For licensees who graduated from an accredited school of optometry on or before May 1, 2008, and who are not described in paragraph (2) or (3), submission of proof of satisfactory completion of the requirements for certification established by the board under Chapter 352 of the Statutes of 2008.

(d) An optometrist certified pursuant to Section 3041.3 shall be certified to administer authorized immunizations, as
 described in subparagraph (D) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (a), after the optometrist meets all of the following requirements:

(1) Completes an immunization training program endorsed by the federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC) or the Accreditation Council for Pharmacy Education that, at a minimum, includes hands-on injection technique, clinical evaluation of indications and contraindications of vaccines, and the recognition and treatment of emergency reactions to vaccines, and maintains that training.

(2) Is certified in basic life support.

(3) Complies with all state and federal recordkeeping and reporting requirements, including providing documentation to the patient’s primary care provider and entering information in the appropriate immunization registry designated by the immunization branch
 of the State Department of Public Health.

(4) Applies for an immunization certificate in accordance with Section 3041.5.

(e) Other than for prescription ophthalmic devices described in subdivision (b) of Section 2541, any dispensing of a therapeutic pharmaceutical agent by an optometrist shall be without charge.

(f) An optometrist licensed under this chapter is subject to the provisions of Section 2290.5 for purposes of practicing telehealth.

(g) For the purposes of this chapter, all of the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Adnexa” means the eyelids and muscles within the eyelids, the lacrimal system, and the skin extending from the eyebrows inferiorly, bounded by the medial,
 lateral, and inferior orbital rims, excluding the intraorbital extraocular muscles and orbital contents.

(2) “Anterior segment” means the portion of the eye anterior to the vitreous humor, including its overlying soft tissue coats.

(3) “Ophthalmologist” means a physician and surgeon, licensed under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code, specializing in treating eye disease.

(4) “Physician and surgeon” means a physician and surgeon licensed under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code.

(5) “Prevention” means use or prescription of an agent or noninvasive device or technology for the purpose of inhibiting the development of an authorized condition or
 disease.

(6) “Treatment” means use of or prescription of an agent or noninvasive device or technology to alter the course of an authorized condition or disease once it is present.

(h) In an emergency, an optometrist shall stabilize, if possible, and immediately refer any patient who has an acute attack of angle closure to an ophthalmologist.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 105, Sec. 7.   (AB 144)   Effective September 17, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

3041.1.

An optometrist diagnosing or treating eye disease shall be held to the same standard of care to which physicians and surgeons and osteopathic physicians and surgeons are held. An optometrist shall consult with and, if necessary, refer to a physician and surgeon or other appropriate health care provider when a situation or condition occurs that is beyond the optometrists’s scope of practice. Consultations, referrals, and notifications required by this section shall be documented in the patient record.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 549, Sec. 3.   (AB 443)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

3041.2.

The California State Board of Optometry shall, by regulation, establish educational and examination requirements for licensure to ensure the competence of optometrists to practice pursuant to this chapter. Satisfactory completion of the educational and examination requirements shall be a condition for the issuance of an original optometrist license or certifications pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 630, Sec. 83.   (AB 1534)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

3041.3.

(a) In order to be certified to use therapeutic pharmaceutical agents and authorized to diagnose and treat the conditions listed in subdivisions (b) and (d) of Section 3041, an optometrist shall apply for a certificate from the board and meet all requirements imposed by the board.

(b) The board shall grant a therapeutic pharmaceutical agents (TPA) certification to any applicant who graduated from a California accredited school of optometry prior to January 1, 1996, is licensed as an optometrist in California, and meets all of the following requirements:

(1) Completes a preceptorship of no less than 65 hours, during a
 period of not less than two months nor more than one year, with either a TPA-certified optometrist in good standing or a physician and surgeon board-certified in ophthalmology in good standing. The training received during the preceptorship shall be on the diagnosis, treatment, and management of ocular and systemic disease. The preceptor shall certify completion of the preceptorship using a form approved by the board. The individual serving as the preceptor shall schedule no more than three optometrist applicants for each of the required 65 hours of the preceptorship program. This paragraph shall not be construed to limit the total number of optometrist applicants for whom an individual may serve as a preceptor, and is intended only to ensure the quality of the preceptorship by requiring that the preceptor schedule the training so that each applicant optometrist completes each of the 65 hours of the
 preceptorship while scheduled with no more than two other optometrist applicants.

(2) Successfully completes a minimum of 100 hours of directed and accredited education in ocular and systemic diseases within two years prior to meeting the requirements of paragraph (1).

(3) Passes the National Board of Examiners in Optometry’s “Treatment and Management of Ocular Disease” examination or, in the event this examination is no longer offered, its equivalent, as determined by the California State Board of Optometry.

(c) The board shall grant a therapeutic pharmaceutical agents certification to any applicant who graduated from a California accredited school of optometry on or after January 1, 1996, who is licensed as an
 optometrist in California, and who passes all sections of the National Board of Examiners in Optometry’s national board examination or its equivalent, as determined by the
 California State Board of Optometry.

(d) The board shall grant a therapeutic pharmaceutical agents certification to any applicant who is an optometrist who obtained their license outside of California if they meet all of the requirements for an optometrist licensed in California to be granted a therapeutic pharmaceutical agents certification.

(1) In order to obtain a therapeutic pharmaceutical agents certification, any optometrist who obtained their license outside of California and graduated from an accredited school of optometry prior to January 1, 1996, shall be required to fulfill the requirements set forth in subdivision (b). In order for the applicant to be eligible for therapeutic pharmaceutical agents certification, the education the applicant received
 at the accredited out-of-state school of optometry shall be equivalent to the education provided by any accredited school of optometry in California for persons who graduate before January 1, 1996. For those out-of-state applicants who request that any of the requirements contained in subdivision (b) be waived based on fulfillment of the requirement in another state, if the board determines that the completed requirement was equivalent to that
 required in California, the requirement shall be waived.

(2) In order to obtain a therapeutic pharmaceutical agents certification, any optometrist who obtained their license outside of California and who graduated from an accredited school of optometry on or after January 1, 1996, shall be required to fulfill the requirements set forth in subdivision (c). In order for the applicant to be eligible for therapeutic pharmaceutical agents certification, the education the applicant received by the accredited out-of-state school of optometry shall be equivalent to the education provided by any accredited school of optometry for persons who graduate on or after January 1, 1996. For those out-of-state applicants who request that any of the requirements contained in subdivision (c) be waived based on fulfillment of the requirement in
 another state, if the board determines that the completed requirement was equivalent to that required in California, the requirement shall be waived.

(3) The California State Board of Optometry shall decide all issues relating to the equivalency of an optometrist’s education or training under this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 630, Sec. 84.   (AB 1534)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

3041.5.

(a) A person requesting to be certified to administer immunizations pursuant to Section 3041 shall apply for a certificate from the board pursuant to an application that shall be in substantially the following form:
“Application for Optometrists to Administer Immunizations

Per California Business and Professions Code §3041(g), you must have a current California Optometrist License and have a Therapeutic Pharmaceutical Agents (TPA) license type to be eligible for a certificate to administer immunizations. “Immunization” means the administration of immunizations for influenza, herpes zoster virus, pneumococcus, and
 SARS-CoV-2, consistent with recommendations adopted pursuant to Section 120164 of the Health and Safety Code, for persons 18 years of age or older.

If eligible, you must also meet and maintain the following requirements for an immunization certificate:

1. Complete an immunization training program endorsed by the CDC or the Accreditation Council for Pharmacy Education that, at a minimum, includes hands-on injection technique, clinical evaluation of indications and contraindications of vaccines, and the recognition and treatment of emergency reactions to vaccines, and maintain that training.

2. Be certified in basic life support.

3. Comply with all state and federal recordkeeping and reporting requirements, including providing documentation to the patient’s primary care provider and entering
 information in the appropriate immunization registry designated by the immunization branch of the California State Department of Public Health.

To apply for an immunization certificate, provide documentation for items #1 and #2 above with your application. All documentation must be provided, or the application will be rejected.

First, Middle, and Last Name:_________________________

Email address:________________________________________

License No.:__________________________________________

1. I declare under penalty of perjury under the laws of the State of California that the information provided on this form and the attached documents or other requested proof of completion is true and accurate. I understand and agree that any misstatements of material facts may be cause for denial of the
 Application for Optometrists to Administer Immunizations and disciplinary action by the California State Board of Optometry.

AND

2. I declare under penalty of perjury under the laws of the State of California that I will comply with all state and federal recordkeeping and reporting requirements, including providing documentation to the patient’s primary care provider and entering information in the appropriate immunization registry designated by the immunization branch of the California State Department of Public Health.

Optometrist Signature: _________________________________

Date:___________________________________________________”
(b) The application for an immunization certificate set forth in subdivision (a) shall be accompanied
 by an application fee of fifty dollars ($50), or a fee in an amount as determined by the board, not to exceed the reasonable cost of administering this section.

(c) After the effective date of this section, the board may modify the Application for Optometrists to Administer Immunizations set forth in subdivision (a) by regulation in accordance with Section 3025.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 105, Sec. 8.   (AB 144)   Effective September 17, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

3042.

The provisions of this chapter do not prevent a licensed physician and surgeon from treating or fitting glasses to the human eye, or from doing any act within the practice of optometry, or a licensed physician and surgeon or optometrist from filling prescriptions or orders, nor do they prevent the replacing, duplicating or repairing of ophthalmic lenses, frames, or fittings by persons qualified to write or fill prescriptions or orders under the provisions of this chapter, nor prevent the doing of the mechanical work upon those lenses, frames, or fittings by an assistant, nor prevent an assistant acting under the responsibility and direction of a physician and surgeon or an optometrist from using any optical device in connection with ocular exercises, vision training, or orthoptics, or acts set forth in Section 2544.

It is unlawful for a person to dispense, replace, or duplicate an ophthalmic lens without a prescription or order from a licensed physician and surgeon or optometrist.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 426, Sec. 30.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

3042.5.

(a) The practice of persons actually enrolled as undergraduate or graduate students of optometry in the clinical departments of schools or colleges of optometry accredited by the board shall be exempt from the provisions of this chapter; provided, however, that such practice shall be entirely confined to the operations of the clinical department of the accredited school or college of optometry and shall be carried on only in pursuing the study of optometry.

(b) The board may grant, for specified periods, exemption from the provisions of this chapter to any person who is licensed in another state or country and who is employed as a clinician or instructor by an accredited school or college of optometry. Such exemption from the provisions of this chapter shall extend only to practice which is conducted for educational purposes and which is confined to the clinical department of the accredited school or college employing the person to whom the exemption is granted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 110.)
-------------------------------------------

3043.

The provisions of this chapter do not prohibit the sale of goggles, sun glasses, colored glasses or occupational eye-protective devices if they do not have refractive values nor do the provisions of this chapter prohibit the sale of complete ready to wear eyeglasses as merchandise by any person not holding himself out as competent to examine, test or prescribe for the human eye or its refractive errors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1937, Ch. 423.)
-------------------------------------------

3044.

A person over the age of 18 years desiring to engage in the practice of optometry in this state may file an application for examination and an application for licensure. The application shall be accompanied by the fee required by this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 426, Sec. 31.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

3045.

Applications shall be verified by the oath of the applicant and shall contain information and evidence satisfactory to the board showing the eligibility of the applicant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 426, Sec. 32.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

3046.

In order to obtain a license to practice optometry in California, an applicant shall be a natural person, have graduated from an accredited school of optometry, have passed the required examinations for licensure, not have met any of the grounds for denial established in Section 480, and not be currently required to register as a sex offender pursuant to Section 290 of the Penal Code. The proceedings under this section shall be in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 788, Sec. 25.   (SB 776)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

3046.1.

(a) The board shall issue a temporary license to practice optometry to a person who applies for and is eligible for licensure pursuant to Section 3046, but who is unable to immediately take the Part III - Patient Encounters and Performance Skills Examination developed by the National Board of Examiners in Optometry (NBEO), required for licensure under this chapter, due to the state of emergency, proclaimed by the Governor on March 4, 2020, in response to the COVID-19 pandemic. In addition to Section 3046, the person shall also satisfy all of the following conditions:

(1) The person has never been previously licensed to practice optometry in any state in the United States.

(2) The person pays to the board the applicable fee of one hundred dollars ($100), or a fee in an amount as determined by the board, not to exceed the reasonable cost of administering this section and submits an application to be a temporary licensee, as described in subdivision (j), to the board.

(3) The person has received approval from their accredited school of optometry that the person meets the educational requirements to practice optometry.

(4) The person satisfies all other conditions to licensure
 established by this chapter.

(b) A person holding a temporary license shall be subject to the same rights and restrictions that are afforded to a person holding a valid, unrevoked California optometrist license, except as set forth in this section. For the purposes of this chapter, “temporary licensee” means a person holding a temporary license pursuant to this section.

(c) A temporary licensee shall practice under the direct supervision of a supervising optometrist. For the purposes of this chapter, “supervising optometrist” means a California licensed optometrist that has been licensed for a minimum of five years and has been certified for the treatment of glaucoma, pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 3041, and submits an application to be a supervising
 optometrist, as described in subdivision (k), to the board. A licensed physician practicing ophthalmology may also supervise a temporary licensee and shall be subject to all of the same reporting requirements as set forth in this section.

(d) Notwithstanding any other law, a temporary licensee may perform services as authorized by this chapter if both of the following requirements are met:

(1) The temporary licensee renders the services under the direct supervision of a supervising optometrist who is not subject to a disciplinary condition imposed by the board prohibiting that supervision or prohibiting the employment of a temporary licensee.

(2) The supervising optometrist is legally and professionally responsible
 for the actions of the temporary licensee.

(e) For the purposes of this chapter, “direct supervision” means that a supervising optometrist oversees the activities of, and accepts responsibility for, the services rendered by a temporary licensee. Direct supervision, as defined in this subdivision, requires that the supervising optometrist be physically present and immediately available in the facility or office in which the optometric services are being provided when the temporary licensee is with a patient.

(f) The supervising optometrist shall have a formal written procedure in place by which patients are informed that an optometrist with a temporary license will be performing the services. Additionally, the patient shall be informed that the supervising optometrist will be supervising the
 temporary licensee and the supervising optometrist will be identified to the patient. The temporary licensee shall note in the medical record the patient’s consent to this process prior to performing services authorized by this chapter.

(g) During the timeframe in which the temporary licensee holds a temporary license, the temporary licensee shall not open their own optometric office or place of practice.

(h) The temporary license shall expire either upon the date that the temporary licensee completes all of the requirements for licensure or six months after the date the state of emergency, proclaimed by the Governor on March 4, 2020, in response to the COVID-19 pandemic has ended, pursuant to Section 8629 of the Government Code, whichever occurs first.

(i) The supervising optometrist shall submit in writing to the board any violations of this chapter committed by the temporary licensee within 14 days of becoming aware of the violation.

(j) A person requesting to be a temporary licensee shall apply to the board pursuant to an application that shall be in substantially the following form, and may include any other information the board deems appropriate to safeguard the public from substandard optometric care, fraud, or other violation of this chapter:

“Application for Temporary License

Pursuant to Section 3046.1 of the Business and Professions Code, the board shall issue a temporary license to practice optometry to any person who applies for and is
 eligible for licensure pursuant to Section 3046 of the Business and Professions Code, but who is unable to immediately take the Part III - Patient Encounters and Performance Skills Examination developed by the National Board of Examiners in Optometry (NBEO), required for licensure under this chapter, due to the state of emergency, proclaimed by the Governor on March 4, 2020, in response to the COVID-19 pandemic. If eligible, you must also meet and maintain the following requirements to be a temporary licensee:

(1) Never been previously licensed to practice optometry in any state in the United States; and

(2) Receive confirmation via transcript or other correspondence from your accredited school of optometry that you meet the educational requirements to practice optometry.

To apply to be a temporary licensee, provide documentation for item (2) above with your application. All documentation must be provided, or the application will be rejected.First, Middle, and Last Name: Address (City, State, Zip Code): Phone Number: Email Address: Social Security or ITIN number: Date of Birth: Name of School of Optometry: Address of School of Optometry (City, State, Zip Code, Country):
 Date Degree Conferred: Name and License Number of Supervising Optometrist: Date you completed the CLRE: Regulations require the submission of fingerprints prior to issuance of the temporary license. Due to a change in the regulations, fingerprints are now checked by the Department of Justice (DOJ) and the Federal Bureau of Investigation (FBI). Live Scan is required for California residents and a Manual Fingerprint Card is required for non-California residents.I declare under penalty of perjury under the laws of the State of California that the information provided on this form and the attached documents or other requested proof of completion is true and accurate. I
 understand and agree that any misstatements of material facts may be cause for denial of the Application for Temporary License and disciplinary action by the State Board of Optometry.Applicant Signature: Date: ”(k) A person requesting to be a supervising optometrist shall apply to the board pursuant to an application that shall be in substantially the following form, and may include any other information the board deems appropriate to safeguard the public from substandard optometric care, fraud, or other violation of this chapter:

“Application to be a Supervising Optometrist

Pursuant to Section 3046.1 of the Business
 and Professions Code, an individual may act as supervising optometrist to a temporary licensee, as defined in that section, if they meet the following conditions:

(1) Has been licensed for a minimum of five years; and

(2) Has been certified for the treatment of glaucoma pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 3041.

To apply to be a supervising optometrist, provide documentation for items (1) and (2) above with your application. All documentation must be provided, or the application will be rejected.First, Middle, and Last Name: Address of Record: Phone
 Number: Email Address: License Number: Name of temporary licensee whom you will be

supervising: 1. I declare under penalty of perjury under the laws of the State of California that the information provided on this form and the attached documents or other requested proof of completion is true and accurate. I understand and agree that any misstatements of material facts may be cause for denial of the application to be a Supervising Optometrist and disciplinary action by the State Board of Optometry.AND2. I declare under penalty of perjury under the laws of the State of California that I will comply with all duties as a
 supervising optometrist set forth in Section 3046.1 of the Business and Professions Code, and that pursuant to that section, I am legally and professionally responsible for the actions of the temporary licensee which may result in action being taken against my license in cases of temporary licensee misconduct.Applicant Signature: Date: ”(l) The board shall not be required to adopt regulations pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) to carry out this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 788, Sec. 26.   (SB 776)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

3047.

(a) The board shall develop an interface with the National Practitioner Data Bank for the purpose of conducting inquiries on applicants for licensure, applicants for renewal of licensure, and current licensees.

(b) The board shall limit its inquiries to both of the following:

(1) Whether an applicant or current licensee has been subject to discipline.

(2) Whether an applicant or current licensee has been the subject of an action required to be reported to the National Practitioner Data Bank by federal law.

(c) On and after July 1, 2018, the board shall charge, in addition to
 the fees in Section 3152, an applicant for licensure and an applicant for renewal of licensure four dollars ($4) for the purposes of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 571, Sec. 17.   (SB 1480)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

3051.

All applicants for examination for an optometrist license in accordance with the educational and examination requirements adopted pursuant to Section 3023.1 shall show the board by satisfactory evidence that he or she has received education in child abuse detection and the detection of alcoholism and other chemical substance dependency. This section shall apply only to applicants who matriculate in a school of optometry on or after September 1, 1997.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 473, Sec. 8.   (SB 821)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

3053.

All examinations shall be practical in character, designed to ascertain applicants’ fitness to practice the profession of optometry and conducted in the English language. The board may by rule or regulation accept the examination given by other agencies or organizations which it deems equivalent to the examination required to determine an applicant’s fitness to practice optometry.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 872.)
-------------------------------------------

3054.

The passing grades for the licensure examination shall be based on psychometrically sound principles of establishing minimum qualifications and levels of competency. If an applicant fails to pass any section of the examination, he or she may be examined in any succeeding examination held during the next five years only in those sections in which he or she failed to obtain a passing grade.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 426, Sec. 37.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

3055.

The board shall issue a license to an applicant who meets the requirements of this chapter, including the payment of the prescribed licensure, certification, or renewal fee, and who meets any other requirement in accordance with state law. A license or certificate issued under the chapter shall be subject to renewal as prescribed by the board and shall expire unless renewed in that manner. The board may provide for the late renewal of a license or certificate as provided for in Section 163.5.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 426, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

3056.

(a) The board may issue a license to practice optometry to a person who meets all of the following qualifications:

(1) Has a degree as a doctor of optometry issued by an accredited school or college of optometry.

(2) Is currently licensed in another state.

(3) Is currently a full-time faculty member of an accredited California school or college of optometry and has served in that capacity for a period of at least five continuous years.

(4) Has attained, at an accredited California school or college of
 optometry, the academic rank of professor, associate professor, or clinical professor, except that the status of adjunct or affiliated faculty member shall not be deemed sufficient.

(5) Has successfully passed the board’s jurisprudence examination.

(6) Is in good standing, with no past or pending malpractice awards or judicial or administrative actions.

(7) Has met the minimum continuing education requirements set forth in Section 3059 for the current and preceding year.

(8) Has met the requirements of Section 3041.3 regarding the use of therapeutic pharmaceutical agents under subdivision (d) of Section 3041.

(9) Has never had his or her license to practice optometry revoked or suspended.

(10) (A) Is not subject to denial based on any of the grounds listed in Section 480.

(B) Is not currently required to register as a sex offender pursuant to Section 290 of the Penal Code.

(11) Pays an application fee in an amount equal to the application fee prescribed by the board pursuant to Section 3152.

(12) Files an application on a form prescribed by the board.

(b) Any license issued pursuant to this section shall expire as provided in Section 3146, and may be renewed as provided in this chapter,
 subject to the same conditions as other licenses issued under this chapter.

(c) The term “in good standing,” as used in this section, means that a person under this section:

(1) Is not currently under investigation nor has been charged with an offense for any act substantially related to the practice of optometry by any public agency, nor entered into any consent agreement or subject to an administrative decision that contains conditions placed by an agency upon a person’s professional conduct or practice, including any voluntary surrender of license, nor been the subject of an adverse judgment resulting from the practice of optometry that the board determines constitutes evidence of a pattern of incompetence or negligence.

(2) Has no physical or mental impairment related to drugs or alcohol, and has not been found mentally incompetent by a physician so that the person is unable to undertake the practice of optometry in a manner consistent with the safety of a patient or the public.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 549, Sec. 6.   (AB 443)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

3057.

(a) The board may issue a license to practice optometry to a person who meets all of the following requirements:

(1) Has a degree as a doctor of optometry issued by an accredited school or college of optometry.

(2) Has successfully passed the licensing examination for an optometric license in another state.

(3) Submits proof that the person is licensed in good standing as of the date of application in every state where the person holds a license, including compliance with continuing education requirements.

(4) Is
 not subject to disciplinary action as set forth in subdivision (h) of Section 3110. If the person has been subject to disciplinary action, the board shall review that action to determine if it presents sufficient evidence of a violation of this chapter to warrant the submission of additional information from the person or the denial of the application for licensure.
